Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 237.5A, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 237.5A Foster parent training. 1. a. As a condition for initial licensure, each proposed individual licensee shall complete thirty hours of foster parent training offered or approved by the department. However, if When determining the appropriate foster parent training for a proposed individual licensee, the department shall consider the proposed individual licensee has completed relevant training or has a combination of completed licenseeâs relevant training and experience , and the department deems such training or combination to be an acceptable equivalent to all or a portion of the initial licensure training requirement, or Senate File 2096, p. 2 based upon the . In addition, the department shall consider the circumstances of the child who will receive child foster care from the proposed individual licensee and the circumstances of the proposed individual licensee the department finds there is other good cause, the department may waive all or a portion of the training requirement . b. Prior to renewal of licensure, each individual licensee shall annually complete six hours of foster parent training as determined appropriate for the individual licensee by the department . The training 2. Training required under this section shall include but is not limited to physical care, education, learning disabilities, referral to and receipt of necessary professional services, behavioral assessment and modification, self-assessment, self-living skills, and biological parent contact. An individual licensee not be limited to all of the following: a. An overview of child welfare. b. Biological parent contact and supporting a childâs family of origin. c. Behavior management. d. Trauma and the effect on child development. e. Attachment, grief, and loss. 3. A person may complete the training required under this section as part of an approved training program offered by a public or private agency with expertise in the provision of child foster care or in related subject areas. The department shall adopt rules to implement and enforce this training requirement. 2. 4. An individual licensee who is unable to complete six hours of foster parent training annually prior to licensure renewal required under subsection 1, paragraph âbâ , because the individual licensee is engaged in active duty in the military service shall be considered to be in compliance with the training requirement for licensure renewal. 3. 5. The department or the departmentâs agent shall notify an individual licensee within a reasonable amount of time of any training the department believes would benefit the individual licensee in the provision of child foster care. Senate File 2096, p. 3 6. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement and enforce this section. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2096, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor